Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB966.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2181(f) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended to read:Section 2181. Departmental Powers and Duties.--* * *(f) The department shall submit an annual report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Banking and 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Insurance Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Insurance Committee of the House of Representatives regarding the implementation, operation and enforcement of this article, including the aggregate data the department has compiled under subsection (b). The department shall post the report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2182.1. Additional Penalties.--(a) The department shall order an insurer to pay penalties in accordance with subsection (b) whenever the aggregated data compiled under section 2181(b) shows that more than fifty per centum (50%) of all adverse benefit determinations, excluding administrative denials, issued by the insurer in a calendar year were overturned through the insurer's internal claim and appeal procedures specified in section 2164 or the external review processes specified in section 2164.5, 2164.6 or 2164.7.(b) The department shall order an insurer to pay a penalty for each overturned adverse benefit determination in excess of the threshold specified in subsection (a) as follows:(1) For the first overturned adverse benefit determination, fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).(2) For the second overturned adverse benefit determination, one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).(3) For the third and each subsequent overturned adverse benefit determination, two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).(c) Penalties collected by the department under this section shall be used by the department for consumer protection activities.20250HB0966PN1043 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) The penalties under this section shall be in addition to any other penalty or remedy imposed under any other applicable statute.Section 3. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB0966PN1043 - 3 - 1234